Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3401
Act, how cited.

Sections 18-3401 to 18-3418 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 19-5201;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 1.